Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 1

General Provisions and Definitions

35-15-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.”

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 95 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to publish in the Tennessee Code Annotated the revised official comments that are filed with the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission within 30 days of July 1, 2004.

The 2013 Restated Comments to Official Text reflect the input of various groups as well as the comments provided by the Uniform Law Commission.

Law Reviews.

Can't Trust a Trust? Decant (Dan W. Holbrook), 40 No. 8 Tenn. B.J. 20 (2004).

Exploring the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code (C. Shawn O'Donnell), 38 U. Mem. L. Rev. 489 (2008).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: A Fresh Look at State Asset Protection Trust Statutes, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1741 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Federalizing Principles of Donative Intent and Unanticipated Circumstances, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1931 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Pro and Con (Law): Considering the Irrevocable Nongrantor Trust Technique, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1999 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Strange Bedfellows: The Federal Constitution, Out-of-State Nongrantor Accumulation Trusts, and the Complete Avoidance of State Income Taxation, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1945 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Unconstitutional Perpetual Trusts, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1769 (2014).

Tennessee Uniform Trust Code: New Formulation for a Trusty Tool (Marshall H. Peterson), 41 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 24 (2005).

Where There's a Will: The Report of My Practice's Death Was an Exaggeration: The Healthy Prognosis for Estate Planning in Tennessee (Eddy R. Smith), 48 Tenn. B.J. 32 (2012).

35-15-102. Scope.

This chapter applies to express trusts, charitable or noncharitable, and trusts created pursuant to a statute, judgment, or decree that requires the trust to be administered in the manner of an express trust.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 3.